Utah statutes.
62A-2-108.5.   Notification requirement for child placing agencies that provide foster home services -- Rulemaking authority.

(1)  The office shall require a child placing agency that provides foster home services to notify a foster parent that if the foster parent signs as the responsible adult for a foster child to receive a driver license under Section 53-3-211:

(a)  the foster parent is jointly and severally liable with the minor for civil compensatory damages caused by the minor when operating a motor vehicle upon a highway as provided under Subsections 53-3-211(2) and (4); and

(b)  the foster parent may file with the Driver License Division a verified written request that the learner permit or driver license be canceled in accordance with Section 53-3-211 if the foster child no longer resides with the foster parent.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the office may make rules establishing the procedures for a child placing agency to provide the notification required under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 314, 2008 General Session

